New Jersey, session 222, S2123.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety (the division) shall review and collect information and data, and compile a report for release to the Governor and the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), on the following items in regards to the professions or occupations regulated by the division or a board, committee or other entity with the division: (1)   the number of outstanding applications for an initial license; (2)   the average amount of time needed to approve or otherwise process an application for initial licensure; (3)   the number of incomplete applications received that require additional contact with the individual to complete the application and a list of the most common omissions and most common errors made that render an application incomplete; (4)   the monthly average of the number of incoming calls received from applicants for an initial license and the monthly average of the number of inquiries received through a call that are answered; (5)   the amount of funding expended to retain division employees; (6)   initiatives undertaken to recruit and retain new division employees; (7)   the amount of funding expended to improve information technology (IT); and (8)   initiatives undertaken to improve current or to modernize IT. b.    The report required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be submitted six months after the enactment of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 2.    The Attorney General, or a designee, shall develop and administer training specific to a profession and occupation for new employees hired to process initial applications for licensure in the specific profession or occupation. 3.    The Attorney General, or a designee, shall review the feasibility of outsourcing phone call intake and response to businesses or associations that assist individuals seeking a license in a specific profession or occupation. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately and section 1 shall expire upon the submission of the report by the division.